Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.270

Competitive bids—Exemptions.

The county legislative authority may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this chapter pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

[ 1998 c 278 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.270. Prior: 1961 c 169 s 3; 1945 c 61 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-18.]